District of Columbia statutes.
38-274.01

HEI program; DC Collaborative; workforce development plan; HEI scholarship program; career and compensation plan; programmatic and financial report.

(a)

The University of the District of Columbia:

(1)

Shall establish a Higher Education Incentive grant program for the purpose of increasing the number of pre-k teachers and assistant pre-k teachers working in elementary and secondary education in public schools, public charter schools, and CBOs who are meeting degree and credential requirements established by OSSE pursuant to § 38-272.01;

(2)

As part of the HEI program:

(A)

May award institutional grants to District of Columbia colleges and universities to increase the number of teachers with advanced learning credentials;

(B)

May establish an initiative to increase the number of professionals who care for infants and toddlers younger than pre-k age who meet degree and credential requirements established by OSSE; and

(C)

Shall administer any institutional grants awarded pursuant to this paragraph; and

(3)

Shall establish and convene the DC Collaborative, a collaborative of District of Columbia colleges and universities, to assist in developing the HEI program.

(b)

(1)

The University of the District of Columbia shall develop a pre-k workforce development plan, which shall include:

(A)

A clearly articulated vision statement of how the DC Collaborative intends to attract and retain a highly-qualified pre-k workforce;

(B)

Stated goals and strategies based upon a needs assessment of the current pre-k workforce in public schools, public charter schools, and CBOs and a review of higher education institutional capacity;

(C)

The scope and structure of the HEI program and the HEI scholarship program; and

(D)

A timeline and benchmarks for the planning and implementation of the HEI program and the HEI scholarship program.

(2)

The University of the District of Columbia shall submit the pre-k workforce development plan to the Council for review by March 15, 2010.

(c)

As the convener of the DC Collaborative, the University of the District of Columbia shall facilitate the development and implementation of the HEI program, including the distribution of funds to higher education institutions according to their capacity or need, and the HEI scholarship program.

(d)

The University of the District of Columbia shall submit to the OSSE, a proposed career and compensation plan under which a teacher in the CBO sector will be compensated once the teacher meets the degree and credentials requirements established by the OSSE pursuant to § 38-272.01.

(e)

The University of the District of Columbia shall submit an annual programmatic and financial report to the Mayor and to the Council on the status of the DC Collaborative and the Higher Education Incentive grant and scholarship programs.

July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-202, § 401, 55 DCR 6297
Mar. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-285, § 2(f), 57 DCR 11005
This section is referenced in § 38-271.01, § 38-274.03, and § 38-1202.06.
D.C. Law 18-285 rewrote the section, which formerly read:
“(a) The Higher Education Incentive grant program shall be established by OSSE for the purpose of increasing the number of pre-k teachers, and assistant teachers, with advanced learning credentials. The HEI program shall consist of a consortium of colleges in the District, including the Graduate School, United States Department of Agriculture, that offers continuing education classes for teachers and assistant teachers to obtain a Bachelors degree or an Associates degree.
“(b) The OSSE shall administer the HEI program and award HEI grants, subject to funding, to qualified teachers and assistant teachers.”
Section 2(g) of D.C. Law 18-142 rewrote the section to read as follows:
“Sec. 401. DC Collaborative; HEI program; HEI scholarship program; career and compensation plan.
“(a) The University of the District of Columbia shall establish and convene a collaborative of District of Columbia colleges and universities (‘DC Collaborative’) to craft the HEI program and HEI scholarship program, in collaboration with the Office of the State Superintendent of Education, for the purpose of increasing the number of teachers and assistant teachers in public schools, public charter schools, and CBOs who are meeting degree and credential requirements established by the OSSE pursuant to section 201.
“(b)(1) The DC Collaborative shall develop a pre-k workforce development plan, which shall include:
“(A) A clearly articulated vision statement of how the DC Collaborative intends to attract and retain a highly-qualified pre-k workforce;
“(B) Stated goals and strategies based upon a needs assessment of the current pre-k workforce in public schools, public charter schools, and CBOs and a review of higher education institutional capacity;
“(C) The scope and structure of the HEI program and the HEI scholarship program; and
“(D) A timeline and benchmarks for the planning and implementation of the HEI program and the HEI scholarship program.
“(2) The University of the District of Columbia shall submit the pre-k workforce development plan to the Council for review by March 15, 2010.
“(c) As the convener of the DC Collaborative, the University of the District of Columbia shall facilitate the development and implementation of the HEI program, including the distribution of funds to higher education institutions according to their capacity or need, and the HEI scholarship program.
“(d) The University of the District of Columbia shall submit to the OSSE, a proposed career and compensation plan under which a teacher in the CBO sector will be compensated once the teacher meets the degree and credentials requirements established by the OSSE pursuant to section 201.”.
Section 5(a) of D.C. Law 18-142 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(f) of Pre-k Acceleration and Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 19-4, February 11, 2011, 58 DCR 1399).